California statutes. Water Code
If the public nuisance is not abated within the time specified by the district in the notice, the district may abate the public nuisance. Any entry upon private property by the district for this purpose shall be preceded by written notice to the record owner of the property stating the date and place of entry and that the purpose of entry is to abate the public nuisance. If the mailed notice is returned undelivered, the district shall post a copy of the notice at the proposed entry point of the property at least five days prior to entry. Thereafter, the district may take all actions necessary to abate the public nuisance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.38.

(a) All costs incurred by the district in abating a public nuisance pursuant to this article are a lien upon the property.

(b) Notice of the lien shall include the name of the record owner, the property on which the nuisance was abated, and the amount of the lien. The notice of lien shall be recorded by the district in the Office of the Alameda County Recorder within one year after the date on which the district initially incurs costs to abate the public nuisance or within 90 days after the completion of the abatement of the public nuisance, whichever occurs first. Upon recordation of the notice of lien, the lien shall have the same force, effect, and priority as a judgment lien, except that it will attach only to the property described in
 the notice, and shall continue until released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

31142.39.

All actions authorized by this article shall be undertaken in a manner that is consistent with the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341 et seq.) and Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 563, Sec. 1.   (SB 133)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.4. Sierra Lakes County Water District [31142.50. - 31142.50.]

31142.50.

(a) In addition to the other powers provided by law, the Sierra Lakes County Water District shall have, but is not limited to, the authority to prevent nuisance, pollution, waste, and contamination of its drinking water source.

(b) (1) To regulate, prohibit, or control the discharge of pollutants, waste, or other materials in groundwater or surface waters, the district may adopt by ordinance requirements relating to the installation and use of small aboveground or small underground tanks, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) An existing small underground tank for the storage of petroleum located within the tributary watershed of Lake Serena and Lake Dulzura shall
 be annually tested in accordance with the Non-Visual Monitoring/Quantitative Release Detection Methods provided in Section 2643 of Title 23 of the California Code of Regulations.

(B) An existing small aboveground tank or new small aboveground tanks for the storage of petroleum located within the tributary watershed of Lake Serena and Lake Dulzura shall include a secondary containment system that meets the requirements of Section 5704.2.9.7 of the California Fire Code.

(2) To regulate, prohibit, or control the discharge of pollutants, waste, or other materials in groundwater or surface waters, the district may adopt an ordinance that prohibits the installation of new small underground tanks or new underground storage tanks, as defined in Section 25281 of the Health and Safety Code, for the storage of petroleum within the tributary watershed of Lake Serena and Lake Dulzura.

(c) An ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) may provide that:

(1) A violation of the ordinance is an infraction, constitutes a nuisance, or both.

(2) The district may seek redress for violations of the ordinance by bringing a civil action against the violator.

(3) If the violation is an infraction, the district may request that the court impose punishment consistent with subdivision (b) of Section 36900 of the Government Code. For purposes of calculating the punishment, each day of the violation constitutes a separate offense.

(4) If the violation constitutes a nuisance, the district may pursue summary abatement of the nuisance or initiate civil proceedings to abate the nuisance. A
 person found by the court to have committed the nuisance shall be liable for the costs incurred by the district to abate the nuisance, including, but not limited to, the costs of investigation, costs of time and materials expended to eliminate or mitigate the nuisance, court costs, attorney’s fees, and costs of monitoring compliance. The court may also assess any civil penalties established in the ordinance against persons found by the court to have committed a nuisance.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Petroleum” includes crude oil, including heating oil, or any fraction thereof, that is liquid at standard conditions of temperature and pressure. Standard conditions of temperature and pressure for crude oil is 60 degrees Fahrenheit and 14.7 pounds per square inch absolute.

(2) “Small aboveground tank” means a tank that is substantially or totally above the surface of the ground with a capacity of 550 gallons or less and not subject to Chapter 6.67 (commencing with Section 25270) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Small underground tank” means any one or combination of tanks, including pipes connected thereto, that is used for storage of hazardous substances and that is substantially or totally beneath the surface of the ground with a capacity of 1,100 gallons or less.

(4) “Tank” means a stationary device designed to contain an accumulation of hazardous substances that is constructed primarily of nonearthen materials, including, but not limited to, wood, concrete, steel, or plastic that provides structural support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 218.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. San Lorenzo Valley Water District [31143. - 31143.5.]

31143.

In addition to the other powers provided by law, the San Lorenzo Valley Water District, Santa Cruz County, shall have all of the following powers and shall promptly and effectively exercise such powers as may be appropriate to ensure that onsite waste water disposal systems, as defined in Section 6952 of the Health and Safety Code, along the San Lorenzo River do not pollute the river, its tributaries, and ground water:

(a) To carry on technical and other investigations, examinations, or tests, of all kinds, make measurements, collect data, and make analyses, studies, and inspections pertaining to the water supply, use of water, water quality, nuisance, pollution, waste, and contamination of water within the district as such activities relate to the use of public, combined, or private onsite waste water disposal systems.

(b) To require all persons discharging from onsite waste water disposal systems within the district to register the system with the district, and to charge annual registration fees in such amount as will defray all or a portion of the costs of exercising the powers provided in this article. Applications for permits for onsite waste water disposal systems within the district to the County of Santa Cruz shall be referred to the district for the district’s review and comment. 

(c) To adopt and enforce regulations for onsite waste water disposal systems within the district, after holding a public hearing on reasonable notice thereof, to control and enhance the quality of the ground and surface waters of the district, in order to eliminate the pollution, waste, and contamination of water flowing into, through, or originating within watercourses, both natural and artificial, within the district, to prevent contamination, nuisance, pollution, or otherwise rendering unfit for beneficial use the surface or ground water used or useful in the district, and to expend such amounts as are necessary to exercise such powers from the funds of the district. Such regulations shall not be in conflict with state law or county ordinances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1135, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31143.1.

The district shall immediately do all such acts as are reasonably necessary to secure compliance with any federal, state, regional, or local law, order, regulation, or rule relating to water pollution or discharges from onsite waste water disposal systems within the area of the district. For such purpose, any authorized representative of the district, upon presentation of his credentials, or, if necessary under the circumstances, after obtaining an inspection warrant pursuant to Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or with the permission of the owner, shall have the right of entry to any premises on which an onsite waste water disposal system is located for the purpose of inspecting such system, including securing samples of discharges therefrom, or any records required to be maintained in connection therewith by federal, state, or local law, order, regulation, or rule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1135, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31143.2.

(a) Violation of any of the provisions of a district regulation adopted pursuant to Section 31143 may be abated as a public nuisance by the district, and the board of directors may by regulation establish a procedure for the abatement of such a nuisance and to assess the cost of such abatement to the violator. If the violator maintains the nuisance upon real property in which he has a fee title interest, the assessment shall constitute a lien upon such real property.

(b) The amount of any costs incurred by the district in abating such a nuisance upon real property shall be added to the annual taxes next levied upon the real property subject to abatement and shall constitute a lien upon that real property as of the same time and in the same manner as does the tax lien securing such annual taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection, and enforcement of district taxes shall be applicable to such assessment, except that if any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attached thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of such taxes would become delinquent, then a lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such real property and the delinquent and unpaid charges relating to such property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection. Any amounts of such assessments collected are to be credited to the funds of the district from which the costs of abatement were expended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1135, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31143.3.

(a) The owner of any real property upon which is located an onsite waste water disposal system, which system is subject to abatement as a public nuisance by the district, may request the district to replace or repair, as necessary, such system. If replacement or repair is feasible, the board of directors, in its sole discretion, may provide for the necessary replacement or repair work.

(b) The person or persons employed by the board of directors to do the work shall have a lien, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 31143.2, for work done and materials furnished, and the work done and materials furnished shall be deemed to have been done and furnished at the request of the owner. The district, in the discretion of the board of directors, may pay all, or any part, of the cost or price of the work done and materials furnished; and, to the extent that the district pays the cost or price of the work done and materials furnished, the district shall succeed to and have all the rights, including, but not limited to, the lien, of such person or persons employed to do the work against the real property and the owner.

(c) As an alternative power to the enforcement of the lien provided in subdivision (b), the board of directors may, by ordinance adopted by two-thirds vote of the members, fix the costs of replacement or repair; fix the times at which such costs shall become due; provide prior to the replacement or repair for the payment of the costs in installments over a period not to exceed 15 years; establish a rate of interest not to exceed 8 percent per annum, to be charged on the unpaid balance of the costs; and provide that the amount of the costs and the interest shall constitute a lien, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 31143.2, against the respective lots or parcels upon which the work is done.

(d) With the written consent of the owner and the lienholder, if other than the district, the board of directors may issue an improvement bond pursuant to the improvement bond provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 (Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code), to represent and be secured by the lien established pursuant to subdivision (b). The bond may be delivered to the lienholder if other than the district or may be sold by the board of directors at public or private sale. The amount of the bond shall be the amount of the lien, including incidental expenses allowable under the Improvement Act of 1911. The bond term and interest rate shall be determined by the board of directors within the limits established by the Improvement Act of 1911 and other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1257, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31143.4.

In order to avoid duplication, either the district or the County of Santa Cruz may contract with the other party for any services or activities authorized to be performed pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1135, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31143.5.

Any violation of a regulation of the district adopted pursuant to Section 31143 is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment not to exceed 60 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Each day of such a violation shall constitute a separate offense. Any violation or threatened violation of a regulation of the district may also be enjoined by civil suit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1135, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.6. Lompico County Water District [31144. - 31144.6.]

31144.

In addition to the other powers provided by law, the Lompico County Water District, Santa Cruz County, shall have all of the following powers and shall promptly and effectively exercise such powers as may be appropriate to ensure that onsite waste water disposal systems, as defined in Section 6952 of the Health and Safety Code, along the San Lorenzo River do not pollute the river, its tributaries, and groundwater:

(a) To carry on technical and other investigations, examinations, or tests, of all kinds, make measurements, collect data, and make analyses, studies, and inspections pertaining to the water supply, use of water, water quality, nuisance, pollution, waste, and contamination of water within the district as those activities relate to the use of public, combined, or private onsite waste water disposal systems.

(b) To require all persons discharging from onsite waste water disposal systems within the district to register the system with the district, and to charge annual registration fees in such amount as will defray all or a portion of the costs of exercising the powers provided in this article. Applications for permits for onsite waste water disposal systems within the district to the County of Santa Cruz shall be referred to the district for the district’s review and comment.

(c) To adopt and enforce regulations for onsite waste water disposal systems within the district, after holding a public hearing on reasonable notice thereof, to control and enhance the quality of the ground and surface waters of the district, in order to eliminate the pollution, waste, and contamination of water flowing into, through, or originating within watercourses, both natural and artificial, within the district, to prevent contamination, nuisance, pollution, or otherwise rendering unfit for beneficial use the surface or groundwater used or useful in the district, and to expend such amounts as are necessary to exercise these powers from the funds of the district. The regulations shall not be in conflict with state law or county ordinances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.1.

The district shall immediately do all such acts as are reasonably necessary to secure compliance with any federal, state, regional, or local law, order, regulation, or rule relating to water pollution or discharges from onsite waste water disposal systems within the area of the district. For that purpose, any authorized representative of the district, upon presentation of his credentials, or, if necessary under the circumstances, after obtaining an inspection warrant pursuant to Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or with the permission of the owner, shall have the right of entry to any premises on which an onsite waste water disposal system is located for the purpose of inspecting the system, including securing samples of discharges therefrom, or any records required to be maintained in connection therewith by federal, state, or local law, order, regulation, or rule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.2.

(a) Violation of any of the provisions of a district regulation adopted pursuant to Section 31144 may be abated as a public nuisance by the district, and the board of directors may by regulation establish a procedure for the abatement of such a nuisance and to assess the cost of abatement to the violator. If the violator maintains the nuisance upon real property in which the violator has a fee title interest, the assessment shall constitute a lien upon the real property.

(b) The amount of any costs incurred by the district in abating such a nuisance upon real property shall be added to the annual taxes next levied upon the real property subject to abatement and shall constitute a lien upon that real property as of the same time and in the same manner as does the tax lien securing those annual taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection, and enforcement of district taxes shall be applicable to the assessment, except that if any real property to which the lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attached thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of those taxes would become delinquent, then a lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to the real property and the delinquent and unpaid charges relating to the property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection. Any amounts of those assessments collected are to be credited to the funds of the district from which the costs of abatement were expended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.3.

(a) The owner of any real property upon which is located an onsite waste water disposal system, which system is subject to abatement as a public nuisance by the district, may request the district to replace or repair the system, as necessary. If replacement or repair is feasible, the board of directors, in its sole discretion, may provide for the necessary replacement or repair work. 

(b) The person or persons employed by the board of directors to do the work shall have a lien, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 31144.2, for work done and materials furnished, and the work done and materials furnished shall be deemed to have been done and furnished at the request of the owner. The district, in the discretion of the board of directors, may pay all, or any part, of the cost or price of the work done and materials furnished; and, to the extent that the district pays the cost or price of the work done and materials furnished, the district shall succeed to and have all the rights, including, but not limited to, the lien, of the person or persons employed to do the work against the real property and the owner.

(c) As an alternative power to the enforcement of the lien provided in subdivision (b), the board of directors may, by ordinance adopted by two-thirds vote of the members, fix the costs of replacement or repair; fix the times at which the costs shall become due; provide prior to the replacement or repair for the payment of the costs in installments over a period not to exceed 15 years; establish a rate of interest not to exceed 8 percent per annum, to be charged on the unpaid balance of the costs; and provide that the amount of the costs and the interest shall constitute a lien, subject to the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 31144.2, against the respective lots or parcels upon which the work is done. 

(d) With the written consent of the owner and the lienholder, if other than the district, the board of directors may issue an improvement bond pursuant to the improvement bond provisions of the Improvement Act of 1911 (Part 5 (commencing with Section 6400) of Division 7 of the Streets and Highways Code), to represent and be secured by the lien established pursuant to subdivision (b). The bond may be delivered to the lienholder if other than the district or may be sold by the board of directors at public or private sale. The amount of the bond shall be the amount of the lien, including incidental expenses allowable under the Improvement Act of 1911. The bond term and interest rate shall be determined by the board of directors within the limits established by the Improvement Act of 1911 and other applicable provisions of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.4.

In order to avoid duplication, either the district or the County of Santa Cruz may contract with the other party for any services or activities authorized to be performed pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.5.

(a) Whenever, in the opinion of the board of directors, the public interest or convenience may require, the board of directors may undertake any work necessary or incidental to the prevention, mitigation, abatement, or control of water pollution from public, combined, or private onsite waste water disposal systems, or to repair damages resulting therefrom.

(b) For purposes of this section, “water pollution” means actual or threatened pollution to the San Lorenzo River and its tributaries, ground and surface waters of the district, and water flowing into, through, or originating within watercourses, both natural and artificial, within the district.

(c) The work may be performed on private property with the prior written consent of the owner thereof, if the board of directors of the district, in the resolution of intention, determines that it is in the public interest to do so.

(d) The work or improvement shall be done and the cost thereof assessed and collected in accordance with the procedures of the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), or the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.6.

Any violation of a regulation of the district adopted pursuant to Section 31144 is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed 60 days, or by both that fine and imprisonment. Each day of the violation shall constitute a separate offense. Any violation or threatened violation of a regulation of the district may also be enjoined by civil suit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 257, Sec. 2.   Effective June 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.7. Malaga County Water District [31144.7. - 31144.79.]

31144.7.

In addition to the other powers provided by law, the Malaga County Water District, Fresno County, shall, within the boundaries of the district, have all of the following powers and shall promptly and effectively exercise those powers that are appropriate for improving water quality and supply, reducing the use of water, and preventing nuisance, pollution, waste, and contamination of water:

(a) To carry on technical and other investigations, examinations, or tests, of all kinds, make measurements, collect data, and make analyses, studies, and inspections pertaining to the water supply, use of water, water quality, nuisance, pollution, waste, and contamination of water, both within and without the district, including, but not limited to, those activities related to use of public, combined, or private septic and septic tank disposal systems.

(b) To regulate, prohibit, or control the discharge of pollutants, waste, or any other material into the district’s facilities by requiring dischargers to obtain a permit from the district prior to any discharge and by prohibiting the discharge of pollutants or other material which does or may cause a nuisance into the district’s facilities without first obtaining a permit from the district, but if a federal permit has been issued for the discharge, a permit may be issued by the district at no fee to the discharger; to require a fee to be collected prior to the issuance of a discharge permit, if the amount of the fee does not exceed the cost of issuing the permit; to require all permitholders to indemnify the district from any and all damages, penalties, or other expenses imposed on or required of the district by state or federal agencies due to any discharge by the permitholders into district facilities.

(c) To establish compliance with any federal, state, or local law, regulation, order, or rule relating to water pollution or the discharge of pollutants, waste, or any other material into the district’s facilities. For this purpose, any authorized representative of the district, upon presentation of his or her credentials or, if necessary under the circumstances, after obtaining an inspection warrant pursuant to Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, has the right of entry to any premises on which a water pollution, waste, or contamination source is located for the purpose of inspecting the source, including securing samples of discharges therefrom, or any records required to be maintained in connection therewith by federal, state, or local law, regulation, order, or rule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.71.

(a) For the common benefit of the district and for the purpose of managing the groundwater basin and managing, replenishing, regulating, and protecting the groundwater supplies within the district, the Malaga County Water District may exercise any of the following powers:

(1) Provide for the conjunctive use of groundwater and surface water resources within the district.

(2) Store water in underground water basins or reservoirs within or outside of the district.

(3) Exchange water.

(4) Distribute water to persons in exchange for ceasing or reducing groundwater extractions.

(5) Transport, reclaim, purify, treat, inject, extract, or otherwise manage and control water for the beneficial use of persons or property within the district and to improve and protect the quality of groundwater supplies within the district.

(b) The district may, pursuant to Sections 31020 and 31021, enter into an agreement or agreements with other public agencies for the purpose of participating in basinwide groundwater management activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.72.

In addition to the other powers provided by law, the Malaga County Water District may levy and collect fees or charges in the manner provided for in this division for activities undertaken pursuant to Section 31144.71.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.73.

The district shall biennially prepare a written report on the district’s activities in the protection and augmentation of the water supplies of the district. The report shall include, among other information the board may order, a financial analysis of the district’s water utility system; information as to the present and future water requirements of the district, the water supply available to the district, and future capital improvement and maintenance and operating requirements; a method of financing those requirements; a recommendation as to whether or not a groundwater charge should be levied in any zone or zones of the district during the ensuing water year and, if any groundwater charge is recommended, a proposal of a rate per acre-foot for all water other than agricultural water for the zone or zones.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.74.

As used in connection with the groundwater charge authorized by this article, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “District” means the Malaga County Water District.

(b) “Person,” “owner,” or “operator” means federal, state, or local agencies, private corporations, firms, or partnerships, and individuals or groups of individuals, whether legally organized or not. “Owner” or “operator” also means the person to whom a water-producing facility is assessed by the county assessor, or, if not separately assessed, the person who owns the land upon which a water-producing facility is located.

(c) “Groundwater” means nonsaline water beneath the natural surface of the ground, whether or not flowing through known and definite channels. “Nonsaline water” means water which has less than 1,000 parts of chlorides to 1,000,000 parts of water, both quantities measured by weight.

(d) “Production” or “producing” means the extraction or extracting of groundwater, by pumping or any other method, from shafts, tunnels, wells (including, but not limited to, abandoned oil wells), excavations or other sources of groundwater, for domestic, municipal, irrigation, industrial, or other beneficial use, but does not mean or include the extraction of groundwater produced in the construction or reconstruction of a well, or water incidentally produced in a bona fide mining or excavation operation or water incidentally produced in the bona fide construction of a tunnel, unless the groundwater so extracted shall be used or sold by the producer for domestic, municipal, irrigation, industrial, or other beneficial use.

(e) “Water-producing facility” means any device or method, mechanical or otherwise, for the production of water from the groundwater supplies within the district or a zone thereof.

(f) “Water production statement” means the certified statement filed by the owner or operator of a water-producing facility with the district of the production of groundwater from the facility in a specified period.

(g) “Water year” means July 1 of one calendar year to June 30 of the following calendar year.

(h) “Agricultural water” means water primarily used in the commercial production of agricultural crops or livestock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.75.

On the second Tuesday in February of each even-numbered year, the report shall be delivered to the clerk of the district board in writing. The clerk shall publish, pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, a notice of the receipt of the report and of the public hearing to be held on the second Tuesday in March in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published within the district, at least 10 days prior to the date at which the public hearing regarding the report shall be held. The notice, among other information which the district may provide therein, shall contain an invitation to all operators of water-producing facilities within the district, or any person interested in the district’s activities in the protection and augmentation of the water supplies of the district, to call at the offices of the district to examine the report. A public hearing shall be held on the second Tuesday of March of each even-numbered year in the chambers of the board, at which time any operator of a water-producing facility in the district, or any person interested in the district’s activities in the protection and augmentation of the water supplies of the district, may in person, or by representative, appear and submit evidence concerning the subject of the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.76.

(a) Prior to the end of the water year in which the hearing is held, and based upon the findings and determinations at the hearing, the board shall determine whether or not a groundwater charge should be levied in any zone or zones. If the board determines that a groundwater charge should be levied, the board shall levy, assess, and affix the charge or charges against all persons operating water-producing facilities within that zone or zones during the ensuing water year. The charge shall be computed at a fixed and uniform rate per acre-foot for all water other than agricultural water. The rates shall be established each year in accordance with a budget for that year and shall be at a fixed and uniform rate for all water other than agricultural water.

(b) Any groundwater charge levied pursuant to this article shall be in addition to any general tax or assessment levied within the district or any zone or zones thereof.

(c) Clerical errors occurring or appearing in the name of any person or in the description of the water-producing facility where the production of water therefrom is otherwise properly charged, or in the making or extension of any charge upon the records which do not affect the substantial rights of the assessee or assessees, shall not invalidate the groundwater charge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.77.

(a) After the establishment of a zone in which a groundwater charge may be levied, each owner or operator of a water-producing facility within the zone, until such time as the water-producing facility has been permanently abandoned, shall file with the district, on or before the 30th day following the end of collection periods established by the board, a water production statement setting forth the total production in acre-feet of water for the preceding collection period, a general description or number locating each water-producing facility, the method or basis of the computation of that water production, and the amount of the groundwater charge based on that computation. The collection periods may be established at not greater than a year or less than six months. If no water has been produced from the water-producing facility during a preceding collection period, this statement shall be filed, setting forth that no water has been produced during that period. The statement shall be verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. The groundwater charge is payable to the district on or before the last date upon which the water production statements shall be filed, and is computed by multiplying the production in acre-feet of water for each classification as disclosed in the statement by the groundwater charge for each classification of water. At the time any water-producing facility has been permanently abandoned, the operator shall give written notice of the abandonment to the district. If any operator of a water-producing facility fails to pay the groundwater charge when due, the district shall charge interest at the rate of 1 percent each month on the delinquent amount of the groundwater charge.

(b) If any owner or operator of a water-producing facility fails to register each water-producing facility, or fails to file the water production statements as required by this article, the district shall, in addition to charging interest as provided, assess a penalty charge against that owner or operator in subdivision (a), an amount of 10 percent of the amount found by the district to be due. The board may adopt regulations to provide that in excusable or justifiable circumstances the penalty may be reduced or waived.

(c) When a water-measuring device is permanently attached to a water-producing facility, the record or production as disclosed by that water-measuring device shall be presumed to be accurate and shall be used as the basis for computing the water production of that water-producing facility in completing the water production statement, unless it can be shown that the water-measuring device is not measuring accurately.

(d) When a water-measuring device is not permanently attached to a water-producing facility, the board may establish a method or methods to be used in computing the amount of water produced from the water-producing facility. The methods may be based upon any, or any combination, of the following criteria:

(1) The minimum charge sufficient to cover administrative costs of collection. 

(2) The size of the water-producing facility discharge opening.

(3) The area served by the water-producing facility.

(4) The number of persons served by the water-producing facility.

(5) The use of land served by the water-producing facility.

(6) Any other criteria which may be used to determine with reasonable accuracy the amount of water produced from the water-producing facility.

(e) The district may levy an annual charge upon a water-producing facility for which no production has been recorded but which has not been permanently abandoned, except that this charge shall not exceed the annual cost to the district of maintaining and administering the registration of that facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

31144.78.
